Massachusetts, session 194th, H2702.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 38B of Chapter 127 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection b and inserting in place thereof the
following subsection:-
“(b) Any person in the custody of a correctional facility, including any jail, house of
correction, trial court detention facility or state prison, who commits an assault or an assault and
battery upon an officer or other employee, any volunteer or employee of a contractor in any such
facility or any duly authorized officer or other employee of any such facility engaged in the
transportation of a prisoner for any lawful purpose shall be punished by imprisonment for not
less than 5 years in a jail or house of correction or for not more than 10 years in a state prison.
Such sentence shall begin from and after all sentences currently outstanding and unserved at the
time of said assault or assault and battery.”
of 3

SECTION 2. Section 1 of Chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of "Narcotic drug" the
following definition:
“Synthetic Cannabinoids, A class of synthetic chemical compounds that are designed to
mimic the effects of cannabis. Synthetic cannabinoids are often sprayed on plant material and
consumed as a smokable substance or can be found in other forms.
SECTION 3. Section 31 of Chapter 94C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting
after “(32) 3,4–methylenedioxy–N–ethylcathinone” the following:-
(33) synthetic cannabinoids, including K2 or Spice
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any employee
who is injured or becomes ill due to exposure to synthetic cannabinoids (K2) in the course of
their employment, including but not limited to correctional officers, first responders, healthcare
professionals, and other workers who may come into contact with K2 in the workplace, shall be
eligible for medical leave under the Massachusetts Family and Medical Leave Act pursuant to
Chapter 175M of the General Laws. Individuals who are exposed to K2 and suffer from any
related medical condition shall be eligible for workers' compensation or disability benefits and
may apply for Industrial Accident Leave and continue to receive coverage under the Group
Insurance Commission health insurance plan during their recovery period. Employees who are
affected by K2 exposure and are unable to work shall retain eligibility for health insurance under
the GIC without interruption while awaiting final determination of their disability leave status.
The individual shall exhaust all short-term disability benefits from other insurance agencies
before utilizing medical leave benefits provided pursuant to Chapter 175M of the General Laws.
of 3

SECTION 5. The Commissioner of Corrections, in conjunction with the Secretary of
Public Safety and Security, shall develop and implement a system to improve the exchange of
inmate information between county jails and correctional facilities. This system shall facilitate
the sharing of live, real-time data on inmates’ histories, classifications, medical records, and
criminal backgrounds. The Department of Corrections shall develop and implement protocols for
receiving and utilizing this information to expedite the classification and intake process, ensuring
that inmates are classified and placed in appropriate correctional facilities more efficiently.
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect on the first day of the month following 180 days
after passage.
of 3